District of Columbia statutes.
29-1127

Transition concerning real and personal property.

(a)

If, before the applicability date of this chapter, an interest in property was by terms of a transfer purportedly transferred to an unincorporated nonprofit association but under the law of the District the interest did not vest in the association, or in one or more persons on behalf of the association under subsection (b) of this section, on the effective date of this chapter, the interest shall vest in the association, unless the parties to the transfer have treated the transfer as ineffective.

(b)

If, before the applicability date of this chapter, an interest in property was by terms of a transfer purportedly transferred to an unincorporated nonprofit association but the interest was vested in one or more persons to hold the estate or interest for members of the association, on or after the effective date of this chapter, the persons, or their successors in interest, may transfer the interest to the association in its name or the association may require that the interest be transferred to it in its name.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 31 of the Uniform Unincorporated Nonprofit Association Act (2008 Act).